Utah statutes.
75-1-404.   Publication in newspapers.

Newspapers shall publish all notices of proceedings under the code under the heading "Probate, Guardianship, Conservator and Trust Notices. Consult clerk of the court or the respective signers for further information." These notices shall be published as often during the prescribed period as the paper is regularly issued, unless otherwise provided by law or directed by the court, and as far as possible in one column in the alphabetical order of the surnames of decedents, wards, incapacitated persons, and creators of trusts.

